Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.460

Recall campaign. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and ending 30 days after the recall election.

[ 2024 c 164 s 246.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.